Colorado, session 2026A, HB1303.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Colorado:
SECTION 1. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 34-60-106, amend
(20)(d)(III) as follows:
34-60-106. Additional powers of commission - fees - rules -
definitions - repeal.
(20) The commission shall adopt rules to require certification for
workers in the following fields:
(d) Welders working on oil and gas process lines, including:
(III) Passage of the International Code Council Exam F31, national
standard journeyman mechanical, or an analogous successor exam, For any
person working on pressurized process lines in upstream and midstream
________
Capital letters or bold & italic numbers indicate new material added to existing law; dashes
through words or numbers indicate deletions from existing law and such material is not part of
the act.

operations, PASSAGE OF:
(A) THE AMERICAN PETROLEUM INSTITUTE STANDARD 1104,
WELDING OF PIPELINES AND RELATED FACILITIES, OR AN ANALOGOUS
SUCCESSOR CERTIFICATION;
(B) THE AMERICAN SOCIETY OF MECHANICAL ENGINEERS SECTION
IX, WELDING, BRAZING, AND FUSING QUALIFICATIONS, OR AN ANALOGOUS
SUCCESSOR QUALIFICATION; OR
(C) A NATIONALLY RECOGNIZED EXAMINATION, CERTIFICATION, OR
QUALIFICATION, OTHER THAN THOSE SPECIFIED IN SUBSECTIONS
(20)(d)(III)(A) AND (20)(d)(III)(B) OF THIS SECTION, THAT IS APPLICABLE
FOR THE CERTIFICATION OF WELDERS WORKING ON OIL AND GAS PROCESS
LINES.
SECTION 2. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 34-60-121, amend (6),
(7)(b), and (7)(c) as follows:
34-60-121. Violations - investigations - penalties - rules -
definition - legislative declaration.
(6) If the commission determines, after a hearing conducted in
accordance with section 34-60-108, that an energy and carbon management
operator has failed to perform any corrective action imposed under
subsection (4) of this section or failed to comply with a cease-and-desist
order issued under subsection (5) of this section, the commission may issue
an order suspending, modifying, or revoking the operator's permit or
permits or suspending or revoking the operator's license to conduct oil and
gas ENERGY AND CARBON MANAGEMENT operations or may take other
appropriate action. An energy and carbon management operator subject to
an order that suspends, modifies, or revokes a permit or that suspends or
revokes the operator's license to conduct oil and gas ENERGY AND CARBON
MANAGEMENT operations shall continue the affected operations only for the
purpose of bringing the affected operations into compliance with the permit
or modified permit and must bring the affected operations into compliance
under the supervision of the commission. Once the affected operations are
in compliance to the satisfaction of the commission and any penalty not
subject to judicial review or appeal has been paid, the commission may
reinstate the permit or the license to conduct oil and gas ENERGY AND
PAGE 2-HOUSE BILL 26-1303

CARBON MANAGEMENT operations.
(7) (b) If the commission finds, after the hearing conducted pursuant
to subsection (7)(a) of this section, that the energy and carbon management
operator is responsible under the legal standards specified in subsection
(7)(a) of this section, the commission may issue an order that prohibits the
issuance of any new permits to the energy and carbon management operator,
suspends any or all of the energy and carbon management operator's
certificates of clearance, suspends the operator's license to conduct oil and
gas ENERGY AND CARBON MANAGEMENT operations, or any combination of
the three. If the energy and carbon management operator demonstrates to
the satisfaction of the commission that the operator has brought each of the
violations into compliance and that any penalty not subject to judicial
review or appeal has been paid, the commission may vacate the order.
(c) In a hearing conducted pursuant to this subsection (7), the
commission may consider as evidence violations for which enforcement
was commenced prior to May 16, 2024, in determining whether to prohibit
the issuance of any new permits to the operator, suspend any or all of the
operator's certificates of clearance, suspend the operator's license to conduct
oil and gas ENERGY AND CARBON MANAGEMENT operations, or any
combination of the three.
SECTION 3. Act subject to petition - effective date. This act
takes effect at 12:01 a.m. on the day following the expiration of the
ninety-day period after final adjournment of the general assembly (August
12, 2026, if adjournment sine die is on May 13, 2026); except that, if a
referendum petition is filed pursuant to section 1 (3) of article V of the state
constitution against this act or an item, section, or part of this act within
such period, then the act, item, section, or part will not take effect unless
PAGE 3-HOUSE BILL 26-1303

approved by the people at the general election to be held in November 2026
and, in such case, will take effect on the date of the official declaration of
the vote thereon by the governor.
____________________________ ____________________________
Julie McCluskie James Rashad Coleman, Sr.
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE PRESIDENT OF
OF REPRESENTATIVES THE SENATE
____________________________ ____________________________
Vanessa Reilly Esther van Mourik
CHIEF CLERK OF THE HOUSE SECRETARY OF
OF REPRESENTATIVES THE SENATE
APPROVED________________________________________
(Date and Time)
_________________________________________
Jared S. Polis
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF COLORADO
PAGE 4-HOUSE BILL 26-1303